Utah statutes.
26-33a-115.   Consumer-focused health care delivery and payment reform demonstration project.

(1)  The Legislature finds that:

(a)  current health care delivery and payment systems do not provide system wide incentives for the competitive delivery and pricing of health care services to consumers;

(b)  there is a compelling state interest to encourage consumers to seek high quality, low cost care and educate themselves about health care options;

(c)  some health care providers and health care payers have developed consumer-focused ideas for health care delivery and payment system reform, but lack the critical number of patient lives and payer involvement to accomplish system-wide consumer-focused reform; and

(d)  there is a compelling state interest to encourage as many health care providers and health care payers to join together and coordinate efforts at consumer-focused health care delivery and payment reform that would provide to consumers enrolled in a high-deductible health plan:

(i)  greater choice in health care options;

(ii)  improved services through competition; and

(iii)  more affordable options for care.

(2) (a)  The department shall meet with health care providers and health care payers for the purpose of coordinating a demonstration project for consumer-based health care delivery and payment reform.

(b)  Participation in the coordination efforts is voluntary, but encouraged.

(3)  The department, in order to facilitate the coordination of a demonstration project for consumer-based health care delivery and payment reform, shall convene and consult with pertinent entities including:

(a)  the Utah Insurance Department;

(b)  the Office of Consumer Health Services;

(c)  the Utah Medical Association;

(d)  the Utah Hospital Association; and

(e)  neutral, non-biased third parties with an established record for broad based, multi-provider and multi-payer quality assurance efforts and data collection.

(4)  The department shall supervise the efforts by entities under Subsection (3) regarding:

(a)  applying for and obtaining grant funding and other financial assistance that may be available for demonstrating consumer-based improvements to health care delivery and payment;

(b)  obtaining and analyzing information and data related to current health system utilization and costs to consumers; and

(c)  consulting with those health care providers and health care payers who elect to participate in the consumer-based health delivery and payment demonstration project.

(5)  The executive director shall report to the Health System Reform Task Force by January 1, 2015, regarding the progress toward coordination of consumer-focused health care system payment and delivery reform.



Enacted by Chapter 102, 2013 General Session

